Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202655-302
Military Department Aid Fund; grants.

(1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a member of the Military Department may apply to the Adjutant General for a grant under this section. The Adjutant General shall prescribe the form for the application.

(2) The Adjutant General may award a grant to any member of the Military Department who applies under this section and meets the qualifications of an eligible grant recipient that are adopted and promulgated in rules and regulations by the Adjutant General.

(3) The State of Nebraska shall not require or request any recipient of a grant awarded under this section to reimburse any money received from such grant.

(4) No later than January 1, 2027, the Adjutant General shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the qualifications of an eligible grant recipient. Any such rules and regulations shall limit the eligible recipients of any grant awarded under this section to needy uniformed service members of the Military Department.

(5) The Adjutant General may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 79.
July 18, 2026